District of Columbia statutes.
3-610

Protective equipment; rules.

(a)

All contestants competing in any amateur boxing, wrestling, or martial arts match, contest, or exhibition in the District of Columbia shall be properly fitted with and shall at all times during the contest wear protective headgear approved by the Commission.

(b)

All contestants competing in any amateur boxing, martial arts, or other sporting event traditionally utilizing padded gloves shall use thumbless or thumb attached padded gloves approved by the Commission.

(c)

Every amateur or professional boxing, wrestling, or martial arts match, contest, or exhibition conducted in the District of Columbia shall utilize protective floor padding, and in the case of matches, contests, or exhibitions performed in a ring, padded corner posts and padded ropes approved by the Commission.

(d)

The Commission is hereby directed and authorized to promulgate any reasonable rule it may deem necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section, including but not limited to the issuance of rules relating to the type and construction of equipment approved for use in an event covered by this section, the inspection of equipment required by this section prior to the holding of a match, contest, or exhibition covered by this section, and the denial, suspension, or revocation of any authority, license, or permit to conduct any event or events covered by this section for reason of noncompliance with the requirements of this section or rules promulgated by the Commission pursuant to the authority of this section.

Oct. 8, 1975, D.C. Law 1-20, § 11
as added Aug. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-137, § 3, 33 DCR 3798
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 3, 33 DCR 7836
1981 Ed., § 2-610.